Appendix C
Interview 1:
1.    Quite easily, I got comfortable navigating the app in just about 2 minutes. It's very intuitive.
a.    Navigating was quite easy for me. To check my daily achievements from the sleep tracker, I simply used the dashboard link. It's all very well connected and user-friendly.
b.  To move from the friends list to the recipes, I went back to the dashboard first and then selected recipes. It’s pretty straightforward.
2.  I understood how to access all the features right away. It’s quite self-explanatory and was in line with apps I’ve used previously. I think this app design is quite clear and user friendly which helps massively. The icons and text are very clear and guide you through the process smoothly. The design really helps in figuring out what to do next without any hassle.
a. I’m quite content with how the app is already, I honestly don’t know what you could add to improve it!
3. The information provided by the app is definitely sufficient for my needs. As someone interested in tracking daily activity and meeting fitness goals this app provides me with a lot of information. I particularly like the mental health and yoga aspects as that’s what I am really interested in at the moment. The different features and information are very insightful. It motivates me to use the app more because I love how it integrates all the data and presents it in an engaging way. Seeing tangible evidence of my progress inspires me to keep going. Although, maybe variations in macros according to different diets could be considered as an automated process but this is quite small and not at all the most necessary of things to consider.
4.    Very consistent.
a.    The design elements like colour scheme, typography, and layout are very consistent across the app including the mental health and wellbeing section. This consistency provides a sense of familiarity and ease of use.
b.   The hormonal health page adheres to the same design principles as the rest of the app, maintaining a uniform look and feel which helps in user navigation and reduces cognitive load.
5.  The app's ability to personalise my experience, particularly through customisable workout plans and dashboard settings, greatly enhances my motivation. It feels like the app is tailored to meet my personal fitness goals. It’s very inclusive and insightful and caters for a wide range of users.
6.  They motivate me to use the app more, I am able to check friend’s progress and leaderboards. It helps me challenge myself and set goals that I previously wouldn’t have. I gain inspiration for new challenges and work to improve my overall fitness by staying up to date with fitness and health trends. The flipside to this however is that I feel sometimes I may push myself a bit too hard or feel bad for not being able to perform as well as others which could be a little demotivating. However, I would say if integrating social media and so forth, it may be wise to think about security or people who may feel discouraged due to comparing their workouts with athletes. In this sense, maybe the social media/ leaderboard and challenges feature can be made inactive unless chosen otherwise in settings perhaps.
a.    Yes, most definitely and this relates heavily to my previous point where not everyone wants to share their progress or follow others. It leads to a very competitive environment which can be less conducive for health goal achievement. Privacy is preferred by some and this works well for them.
7.   I’d love to get 50% off on boots! Rewards are a great way to keep motivation high and people engaged on their health journey’s knowing that they have something to look forward to when they meet their goals. So they have an added bonus of an extra reward for meeting their goals.
a. Not really! If I had to be quite specific, I love shopping so any shopping rewards. For the app itself, being able to change features, customise the avatar will be a great way but that’s not something I’m personally all that interested in and I don’t think I’d go out of my way to change hair shades etc.
8.  It gives me more confidence; I think there’s a big focus on how hormones and mental health influence one's fitness journey. Having that information to hand that is incredible and insightful can result in bettering one's health and fitness outlook on their own journey I think it's a great way to educate people so they can get the most out of their workouts and their health overall.
9. 9.5
a. Everything is easily accessible and encourages users of all ages to use the app.  the app is great because it encompasses a range of different features trying to cater for a diverse range of users. There is a comprehensive list of different workouts that one can pick from there's also the option to create a personalised fitness plan which I think is great therefore it gets a 9.5. I think because this is just a design at the moment there's a few things to maybe consider therefore I don't want to give it a 10.
10. Yes definitely. I think the colours used are great there is a range of information that is displayed well I think one thing to consider is the amount of information being put onto 1 screen and how this would work for people who use glasses or are trying to read it on the go I think those are things to consider but for myself personally it works really well I think everything I need is there.
a. I liked the sleep tab the most. The layout is simple and effective. Definitely makes me want to regulate my sleep using the app. Sleep is the one thing that I've struggled with quite a bit so being able to track this on a platform that's quite accessible and displays information in an easy to read format I think will be very useful in being able to regulate my sleep.

Interview 2:
1. I could regulate through the app very easily! I think it's a really great looking app that is trying to be quite holistic with articles that could help as well as a social media aspect which also ties into its main function of tracking activity and providing health metrics. I became comfortable with navigating through the app fairly quickly, maybe within 5 minutes? I'd say the areas that took me a bit longer were pages where there were small intricate different icons or lots of different information but otherwise it was quite intuitive and fairly straightforward to understand how to log a new workout or access the sleep tracking for example.

a.    This was a fairly simple process I I understood how this would be used, because I've used a fitness app before I predominantly use my Apple Watch but I knew that I just needed to access the main home screen or dashboard, whatever you want to call it, and then just navigate from there
b.    The quickest way that I was able to navigate to view recipes from the front list was just through the dashboard there's a control panel at the bottom which makes it quite easy to navigate across the different key screens so I think it was it was fairly simple.
2. I would say I really like the icons and the colour scheme is great, the icons made it really easy for me to know what to expect and where to go honestly.
A. the text is one area which I think could be improved possibly just because on some of the pages there's a lot of information in particular like the hormone information page so maybe being able to personalise this to enlarge the text that would be really good.
I also wasn't sure if there's an immersive reader function so maybe that's something to look into unless I'm mistaken. The ability to change fonts of the text being displayed I think just making it quite customisable and the ability to personalise the app as much as possible would be amazing already allow some functionality with this but I'm just thinking just to make it a touch more personal. 
3. I think the app provides a good amount of information if anything I would say maybe it has a lot of information for the type of app it should be but then again that's just my preference I feel there may be people who like to read through bunches of information like it's provided in the articles I personally don't so that's just my opinion. I know that being able to look at my progress over time and getting detailed information on this is very motivating though!
I think if you really wanted to push it however you could maybe look at ram cycles and time spent in deep sleep but I don't know if that would be quite measurable on just a normal phone based app measurable in any way you'd probably need a fitness watch or something like that.
4. How consistent is the design throughout the app?
I think just looking at the app you can tell that the design is quite consistent there are some areas that need improvement for example information pages seem to a little bit different to the main design but overall I think those are just small tweaks that may need to be made or if it's been done on purpose doesn't really make sense so may need to be fixed.
a.    No and this is what I was trying to explain in previous points where there are some variations and I suppose it's something that you wouldn't necessarily pick on or you wouldn't really notice unless you have really paying attention but there definitely is a difference in the well-being section supposed to the workout section for example where the app has a consistent design on most pages it differs on these specific pages. If you think about it in the ground scheme of things perhaps this doesn't really matter but considering that you're creating an app which is part of a brand and an identity having that cohesive design throughout it is quite important from my knowledge and use of other apps it just ensures consistency and it means that you know how and where to use certain things and view information in a certain way.
b.    Likewise, I would say the same exact thing for this page as I have above the well-being pages are differing to the main pages of the app.
5. I think this is a quite positive aspect of the app, having the opportunity to personalise and customise the app means that you can make it to suit your needs which is something that I've always appreciated in other apps that I've used and I think because this is in line with your own fitness journey having that personalisation means that it's your own app is tracking your own metrics and it just makes you even more motivated to use it because you know you'll like what you're seeing.
6. Do the social aspects of the app motivate you to use it more, e.g. social media, friends list, leaderboard?
I'm a very private person so I don't tend to go onto social media to to follow friends or have any interest in the leaderboard I can see the appeal to this for a lot of people and younger generations who would want to compare their workouts to others but for myself I know what routine I like to follow what workouts I want to do so it doesn't really appeal to me. Although I suppose the idea of meeting new people with similar goals, exchanging experiences and the leaderboard for some friendly competition. 
a.    Yes, most definitely. more privacy is ideal, being able to pick and choose what you want to share or not and what you want to view or not for example. perhaps this would make me want to use it but overall I would say I have a lack of interest in this in this feature.
7.  I love the ideas of rewards and incentives it just means that I have something else to work towards apart from just looking and feeling great so for example vouchers or something to build in the app would be a great way to kind of gamify the experience of having to work out and prioritise health. 
a.    I think character customisation is a really great reward type it's something that I would definitely be interested in just seeing the different things that you could potentially get and utilised would be a good idea especially if there's something in particular that I really wanted as part of the character customisation that I could really work for it to try and achieve it this may not be everybody's cup of tea but it's something that I would be interested in.
8. I think it's a fab idea I think this is something that will really help a lot of people for myself in particular as a female, hormonal health is something that's only just being given importance and highlighted as an issue in society so knowing that there's information that I can access as part of this app which is reliable and insightful could mean that I am more equipped in shaping my workouts or the nutrition aspect of my fitness lifestyle.
9. 9
a. Just.. very easy to use. Straight forward, everything is explained with icons and text, really easy to get to it and figure it out. I think it also has amazing features which you would expect in a fitness app the only reason why it's not a 10 is purely because it's got features like social media which I don't think I'd need and this could potentially make the app a little bit more clunky but otherwise it's great the way that it's sectioned out its navigation is very easy and intuitive as mentioned previously.
10. Yes, leaning towards ease of use. I think there's a very good balance between aesthetic appeal and needs of use the icons are very clear to understand it's your typical fitness app but very customisable very personalisable which makes it even more enticing to use I can definitely see it encouraging me to stay consistent with my nutrition and my working out.
 
a. Recipes, daily achievements, rewards, all have an easy to understand layout and are visually captivating to me, motivating me to use the app more.
 
 interview 3:
 
1. the app was quite easy to navigate & memorise it's different trackers. Took around 3 mins
a.    From the sleep tracker page, on the bottom left you will see a house-like icon called "Dashboard", then on the Dashboard page on the top right you will see "Daily achievements", click on it & it'll take you to the achievements page.
b.    From friends list page, on the bottom left you will see "Dashboard", tab it & you see the recipes on the page underneath the strength workout option
2. Icons, they were easy to understand even for my first time using it. Ex: Chatbox like icon for yours chats. I think the icons being so clear makes it easy for users to be able to go back and easily navigate where they're not having to physically have to look at the page and figure out where to go next it's quite intuitive where you know that the home screen will be in the same page on what the icon is for it so you can just click as opposed to having to look read and then click which would take time and kind of deterred users from using the app so that's something that I really liked.
A.  My biggest issue is the Dashboard page, that page on it's own has way too many things in it, Food Recipes? Dashboard, Workout or Sleep tracker? Dashboard! And much much more which makes it seem like anything not on Dashboard doesn't seem that important.
3. shows the information that I want, but I wish i could control which and what information want from the app's trackers. Motivates me personally, but I can imagine other users wishing for more information or less. For sleep tracking though, a suggestion would be perhaps copying an athlete's sleeping schedules would be a good starting point for new users who want to have a healthier sleep.  Actual information on sleeping habits and the importance of getting a particular amount of sleep for different age ranges, female/ male can be quite helpful in helping users with their sleep and this is something that could elevate the app a little bit more.
4. From scale 1 to 10 I'd give it a 7 my point still stands, dashboard contains almost everything for the app, for me personally I believe that it makes the other icons feel or unnecessary barely used for the day to day use
a.   Yes, for the most part but there is some small differences to make the pages look and feel unique.
b.    Same answer, same design when needed and some changes here and there to make it feel & look unique to it's category
5. Yes, customisation will always make me use an app more often because it makes me feel like I'm using something I designed.
6. very motivating. Not only chatting with people trying to improve their health motivates me but I can also get advices from other people. I think chatting with people based to specific topics could be more motivating, for example talking a couple of people in a chatroom dedicated to healthier sleep
a.  Yes & no. Yes, it can be quite easy to talk to people who doesn't know you to talk about your weight to example. No, anonymity in an online app will never end well.
7.  Open the app, get your daily reward and then you are done. Sounds good to make people use the app everyday more I feel like it can be used to more things such as changing app colours with reward coins...etc.
a.    More customisation is always the answer for me, changing apps colour, chatrooms background, profile background that can be visible to other users...etc.
8. not personally for me but I’m a big advocate for promoting holistic wellbeing.
9.  8
a. It's easy to navigate and understand while looks good enough to be a visually good looking app.
10.  Yes. the visual appeal and the ease of usage makes the app a good experience, there doesn’t seem to be one overpowering the other either. 
a. Sleep tracker’s visuals and different colours for it charts is probably my personal favourite, really helps me understand what’s going on in my sleep in a friendly way.
interview 4:
 
1. The navigation process involved moving through various submenus which, while numerous, were logically organised. It took me about an hour of use to become fully comfortable and familiar with the layout and navigation paths.
a.    To switch from monitoring my sleep to checking my daily achievements, I started on the sleep tracker page and pressed the 'dashboard/home' button, which is always visible for easy access. Once on the dashboard, the daily achievements option was prominently displayed at the top right of the page, making it simple to find and select.
b.    From the friends list, which I accessed through my profile, I returned to the dashboard by pressing the 'dashboard/home' button, a consistent element across all pages. The Recipes option was located centrally at the bottom of the dashboard, making it straightforward to move between these features 
2. The app's design uses text labels and icons effectively, which helped me understand how to access its features. The icons are intuitive, but the use of uniform colours for context buttons under the same theme sometimes made it difficult to quickly distinguish different functions
a.  To improve, differentiating button colours or adding unique design elements could help users distinguish between features more rapidly
3. The app provides a high level of detailed information which is great for tracking various health metrics. The richness of the data available makes the app particularly useful for those who are serious about monitoring their health, it’s a great motivator for me. Although introducing categories of sleep types based on the data collected could help users understand their sleep patterns better, perhaps by offering insights into what certain sleep behaviours’ indicate about their overall health. Maybe also incorporating a feature to scan nutritional labels or allow manual entry of dietary information would also work. This could help users better understand their calorie intake and nutritional habits, making the tracking process more interactive and informative.
4. I would say all around consistent, with some variations here and there.
a.    The design of the mental health and wellbeing section closely mirrors that of the hormonal health page, maintaining a consistent aesthetic and functional approach which helps in user adaptation and comfort But I’ve noticed, these differs slightly to the other pages.
b.    Like the mental health section, it maintains the overall design theme, which is clean and user-friendly, contributing to a cohesive user experience across the app
5.   A custom avatar would be nice to have, especially if the avatar reflected your current "fitness". Currently, the avatar function does not seem very engaging. 
6. Being able to share workout results and dietary habits with friends adds an element of fun and encouragement. However, sharing dietary data can sometimes feel less appealing than sharing fitness achievements.
a.    Do you feel keeping social aspects optional and having anonymity in the app is effective?
 Keeping social features optional and allowing for anonymity is effective because it caters to users who prefer privacy, which can make the app more inclusive
7. it definitely seems an encouraging aspect, it’d sure work on me! It has a lot of categories I am interested in as well, and I like its inclusivity of categories.
a.  Character customisation features are particularly appealing as rewards. They add a fun and personalised touch to the app, making the rewards feel more substantial and desirable
8. The support pages like those for mental health and hormonal health are very helpful. They provide actionable advice and support that motivates me to regularly use the app and follow through with the exercises and tips offered
9. 7
a. While the home button efficiently navigates back to the dashboard, the multiple menus require some exploration, which can be a bit overwhelming at first
10. The app strikes a good balance between looking visually appealing and being user-friendly, I feel like it utilises both to be effective honestly
A. One feature that stands out is the scrolling page, which would enhance accessibility by allowing users to view more content easily without navigating away from the page.
 


interview 5:
1. It only took me a few seconds, like 30 seconds maybe max, to get the hang of it. The app works a lot like other apps I’ve used, so it felt familiar.
a.    Getting from the sleep tracker to check my daily achievements was simple. I just clicked on the dashboard and found everything I needed right there.
b.    To get from my friends list to the recipes, I clicked the dashboard button at the bottom right and then picked the recipes option. It was all pretty straightforward.
2. The buttons to move around the app are easy to spot and use. They’re big and clear, so I always knew where to click.
a. there are no improvements that I can think of to make this design aspect better as I really like it.
3.  the details the app gives me about my health are really helpful. It shows me things that encourage me to keep a healthier lifestyle. It would be good if the app could explain more about what the sleep numbers mean though. Like, telling me what a good sleep pattern looks like. Also, maybe it might help if there was a way to see more about what's in my food, like being able to scan a food label to see what nutrients I'm getting.
4. the consistency is there, I can definitely say!
a.  The look of the app feels the same everywhere, even in the mental health section. It’s smooth and everything fits together well.
b.   The same here, it has a streamlined design with the rest of the features
5.  I like being able to change things like my dashboard or what my avatar looks like. It might be even better if I could use a real picture of myself instead of just a cartoon.
6.  it’s fun to see how my friends are doing and to show them my progress too. It makes me want to use the app more.
a.    I think it’s good that you don’t have to share everything if you don’t want to. You can keep some things private or share with people you don’t know without them knowing who you are.
7.  I love it, especially when it gives me things that go well with staying fit, like gear from sports brands.
a.    fitness and wellbeing for sure
8. - These pages are really helpful. They make the app more friendly and supportive, which makes me want to use it more.
9. - 8
a. it’s mostly easy to use, but the design is pretty basic and doesn’t always grab my attention.
10. - The app looks nice and it’s easy to use, but it doesn’t really stand out from other apps. Adding something unique could make it more interesting.
a. sleep tracker had a nice set of visuals that were easy to understand for me, with the right amount of text supporting it.
interview 6 
 
1.  	I got the hang of the app’s navigation really quickly, within just a minute or so. The interface is clean and straightforward, very much in line with other modern apps, which helped me adapt quickly.
a.      When I wanted to check my achievements after tracking my sleep, I simply clicked the dashboard button, which is centrally located and easy to access. The daily achievements section was prominently displayed, making it easy to find.
b.      Similarly, when I was on the friends list and wanted to look at recipes, I just hit the same dashboard button, and from there, recipes were one of the main options. It’s nicely laid out so I can't miss it.
2.  	Understanding how to access the app's features came easily to me due to the clarity of the text, the intuitive icons, and the smart use of colours (although similar due to the theme settings) all contribute significantly. The text is always clear and concise, which helps a lot when navigating through different features.
a. I can’t really think of anything to improve it, it’s ideal for me.
3.  	The app provides just the right amount of information, making it effective and not overwhelming.  It’s packed with useful details and functionalities that cover everything from fitness tracking to dietary suggestions, exactly what I need from a health app.
4.  	The design consistency across the app enhances its aesthetic appeal and user experience.
a.      Every page, whether it’s about mental wellness or physical health, maintains a consistent theme and layout, which makes the transition between sections seamless.
b.      The hormonal health page is just as well-designed as the rest of the app, with all elements matching the overall style, reinforcing the user’s comfort with navigating through different sections.
5.  	The personalisation and customisation features greatly increase my engagement with the app.  Being able to tweak the dashboards and change my avatar keeps the experience fresh and engaging. I find myself logging in more often just to see and use the new customisations I’ve unlocked.
6.  	Social features significantly boost my motivation to engage with the app.  The leaderboard and ability to see my friends' progress introduce a fun, competitive edge that drives me to keep up and even excel. It transforms routine tracking into a more social, shared experience.
a. anonymity is definitely a requirement – people need to be safe out there!
7.  	The rewards system effectively encourages continual use of the app.
a.      I am particularly drawn to rewards that enhance my wellbeing or offer retail discounts, aligning perfectly with my lifestyle and interests.
8.  	Educational content on health topics provided by the app boosts my motivation to maintain healthy habits. It’s really useful. It offers practical advice that goes beyond general knowledge, helping me to apply what I learn directly to my daily routine.
9.  	I rate the app’s usability as absolutely top-notch – 10.
a.      It's so intuitive that I felt almost instantly at ease. The layout is logical, and the features are accessible right from the get-go, which makes navigating through the app a breese.
10.  The app strikes a perfect balance between being visually appealing and easy to use, I’ve had no troubles throughout and was very impressed by the colours and visual aids.
a.      Particularly, the dashboard design is both attractive and functional. It’s easy on the eyes and simplifies access to various features, making everyday interactions enjoyable and efficient.
 
interview 7:
1.	 It took me about 10 minutes to really get comfortable with navigating through the app.
o	 A.Initially, I found navigation a bit confusing because I thought the achievements linked to the sleep tracker would be in the same section. Instead, I had to go to the dashboard and then select daily achievements. 
o	B.  Once I figured out that the dashboard serves as the home menu, navigation became much quicker.
2.	 Accessing different features was quite straightforward. The app uses a consistent colour scheme and the fonts are clear, which definitely helps with usability and accessibility.
a.	I can’t really think of anything, maybe for the icons to be highlighted when you’re on that specific page?

3.	 The information provided does motivate me to use the app more because it's not overwhelming and gives me just enough to work with without feeling overloaded. To be a bit critical though, the visual representation of 'remaining calories' could be improved by using a pie chart to help users visualise their data better.
4.	 The overall design of the app is quite consistent, although the images used throughout could be more uniform.
o	a. Initially, the images' style seemed to differ notably from those in the rest of the app, which was a bit jarring.
o	b. hormonal health seemed more in line with the rest of the app, following colour scheme and icon style.
5.	  I appreciate that the dashboard displays the most crucial information upfront—it's a straightforward approach that works well. However, some users might prefer a more visually appealing interface, given the competition with other apps.
6.	  Personally, I don't find the competitive aspects of health tracking via social features motivating because I don’t view health as a competition. However, I can see how this could motivate others by creating a sense of accountability.
o	a. Keeping social aspects optional and providing anonymity is effective because it allows users who are less competitive to engage with the app without feeling pressured.

7.	Yes, the rewards system does motivate me, although rewarding with something like Nando's seems counterintuitive for a health app!
a.	With that being said, food!
8.	The mental and hormonal health support pages don’t particularly motivate me as they are more reflective and don’t align with my reasons for using the app. I generally don’t use the app for deep self-reflection.
9. I’d rate the app’s ease of use as a 6 out of 10. 
a. There’s quite a bit to navigate through, but it's relatively straightforward for anyone who's somewhat tech-savvy.
10.  The app strikes a good balance between looking decent and being functional. It’s not too flashy, which is good because it makes navigation simple and keeps the focus on functionality.
a. probably the achievements page, I think it had a unique and effective way of showing users what achievements they have and what they have yet to receive.

interview 8:
1.	Navigating the app was straightforward for me. I understood how to navigate it right from the start. The layout was intuitive and user-friendly.
a. When I needed to check my achievements, I easily navigated back to the dashboard and simply pressed the achievements button.
b. To look at recipes, I went from the dashboard directly to the recipes section.
2. I had no trouble understanding how to access the app's different features. The text throughout the app is clear and direct, which helps a lot in guiding me through various sections.
a. I cant think of anything.
3.	The information provided by the app is ample and very useful, it would really be beneficial for myself who’s still a bit new to this. The sleep pages and hormonal health sections offer a lot of personalised information for example which is great for understanding my health needs and getting appropriate support. It would be helpful to add information about how long after eating I should go to bed to promote healthier habits, or including a feature to scan products to get calorie content directly would make tracking my dietary intake much easier and more accurate.
4.	The design of the app is impressively consistent.
a.	a. Yes, the overall design is consistent, which makes the app aesthetically pleasing and easy to use.
b.	The use of consistent colours throughout helps maintain a seamless experience across hormonal health.
5.	The app's personalisation and customisation options significantly increase my motivation, particularly the ability to use coins for purchasing avatar outfits and vouchers. It would also be great to track weight loss over specific periods as an added feature.
6.	Social aspects add an exciting layer of motivation. The app feels more engaging because it allows me to compare my progress with friends, which adds a level of excitement and competition.
a.	Keeping social aspects optional and ensuring anonymity is effective because it allows those who value privacy to use the app without pressure.
7.	The rewards system effectively incentivises continued use of the app.
a.	a. I particularly enjoy the rewards that involve character customisation and food-related incentives, which align well with my interests.
8.	Support pages on mental and hormonal health positively impact my fitness routine. Understanding these aspects helps me relax more while exercising, which enhances my overall wellness and effectiveness of workouts.
9.	On a scale of 1 to 10, the app’s ease of use is a solid 10.
a.	a. The clear text and well-organised sections make it incredibly easy to navigate and understand what each part of the app does.
10.	There is a good balance between aesthetic appeal and usability – I didn’t find myself getting lost and was engaged throughout.
a.	a. The dashboard not only looks good but also functions effectively as a central hub for accessing various features, making the app both attractive and practical to use.
 interview 9:
1.	Navigating through the app was incredibly easy for me. Honestly, it only took me about two seconds to understand how to navigate through the app. The design is very intuitive.
a.	a. I could easily move from one feature to another by pressing just a few buttons; the process required minimal steps and was really straightforward.
b.	b. This was the same case when moving from the sleep section to viewing achievements or recipes—it was all very seamless.
2.	The language used in the app made it easy to understand each section. The text was clear and concise, which helped a lot in quickly understanding what each section was for and how to use it.
a.	Maybe implementing different colours might be more eyecatching for various situations.
3.	The information provided by the app is sufficient and well-integrated. I really appreciate how the mental well-being aspects are integrated with the exercise and recipe sections—it creates a holistic health experience. I think the level of detail is just right; it provides everything I need without being overwhelming. A feature to scan products and automatically log calories that way would additionally be incredibly useful for tracking nutritional intake effortlessly.

4.	The design of the app is consistent and visually pleasing. The app uses very colourful and soft tones throughout, which make it attractive and easy on the eyes.
a.	Perhaps some differences here and there, but I can still tell the mental health pages belong to the same app!
b.	This design consistency extends to hormonal health for sure, creating a relaxing and enjoyable user experience.
5.	The app’s gamification elements significantly enhance my motivation. It makes me feel like I’m playing a game, where I can compete in a friendly manner and have goals to level up my avatar. This feature encourages me to put in my best effort to achieve my health goals.

6.	Social features enhance the app’s engagement for me. Seeing other people’s journeys and progress is inspiring and adds an enjoyable social aspect to my health and fitness routine.
a.	 Having the option to keep some aspects of my activity private or to share them anonymously is great because it accommodates users who might feel shy or embarrassed about sharing their progress.
7.	The rewards system is a powerful incentive to use the app regularly.
a.	a. The character customisation rewards are particularly fun because they allow me to make my avatar look as good as I want, reflecting my real-life health achievements.
8.	The support pages enhance my exercise routine by reducing stress and improving mental clarity. This support allows me to focus more on my exercises with a better state of mind, enhancing the effectiveness of my workouts.
9.	I would rate the app's ease of use as a perfect 10.
a.	a. Its usability is top-notch, similar to other apps in terms of easy navigation and recognisable layout, which makes it extremely user-friendly.
10.	The app has a great aesthetic appeal and is easy to use. Its visual design is so appealing—it could be something I’d use as a background on my phone. The soft tones are soothing, which makes the app not just functional but also a pleasure to use.
a. The dashboard in particular, it really utilises both visual appeal and is versatile to help everyone navigate.
interview 10:
1.	Navigating the app was surprisingly easy and straightforward, I experienced very little to no issues identifying different features. It only took me maybe 5 minutes to get comfortable with the app's layout and navigation. Everything was logically laid out, which made the experience smooth.
a. I found accessing the daily achievements from the sleep tracker quite intuitive. The sleep tracker was prominently displayed on the home page with an appealing moon and clouds icon, making it easy to spot. From there, accessing the information was just a matter of switching it on.
b. To switch from viewing the friends list to checking out recipes, all I needed to do was tap on the dashboard button. It served as a central hub, simplifying my navigation.
2.	I found the app’s features easy to access and understand. The icons, combined with clear, straightforward text, were particularly helpful. The visual representation, like drawings and diagrams of exercises, enhanced my understanding and made the app engaging.
a.	No suggestions here!

3.	The information provided by the app felt adequate for my needs. The variety of exercises and the detailed tracking system, including coins and awards, really motivated me to engage more with the app. For improvement though, in the sleep tracker, perhaps simplifying the charts could help. They are a bit complex and could be more user-friendly. And maybe for calorie tracking, adding a feature that alerts users in colours like red when they go over their daily calorie limit would be a practical enhancement.
4.	The design consistency across the app is striking.
a. The mental health and wellbeing section follows the same visual theme as the rest of the app, but it could benefit from additional details or diagrams to enrich the content.
b. The hormonal health page maintains the consistent theme with the same visual style, ensuring a cohesive experience.
5.	The personalisation and customisation features greatly enhance my motivation. Being able to tailor aspects like dashboards and avatars makes the app feel more personal and directly relevant to my needs.
6.	Social features add a significant motivational boost. The leaderboard and the ability to see how I stack up against friends bring a fun, competitive edge that makes the app more engaging.
a.	Keeping these features optional and allowing for anonymity is crucial. It gives everyone the freedom to choose how much they want to share, catering to different comfort levels regarding privacy.
7.	The rewards system is highly motivating. The flexibility to earn rewards for various achievements is a great incentive.
a.	 I particularly appreciate rewards related to health and well-being, like gym memberships or health food vouchers.
8.	Support pages like those on mental and hormonal health play a crucial role in my routine. They remind me to take care of my mental well-being, which is essential for overall health. This makes me want to keep checking the app to stay on track.
9.	I’d rate the app’s ease of use as a 9 out of 10.
a.	The app is straightforward to navigate and follow, much like popular social media apps, which makes it very user-friendly.
10.	There’s a good balance between the app’s aesthetic appeal and its functionality. The design is not only visually appealing but also effectively organised, making features easy to access.
a.	The sections dealing with different health aspects are particularly well done, as they are not just informative but also easy to reach and use.

interview 11:
1.	Navigating through the app was quite intuitive and easy for me, I knew what to click and move to just purely based on previous fitness app experience and usage. It didn't take me long to get the hang of navigating around; I'd say I was comfortable within just 2 minutes.
a. While using the sleep tracker, I noticed lots of useful tips on improving sleep, complete with a detailed sleep chart. To check my daily achievements, I just had to head back to the dashboard.
b. From the friends list, accessing recipes was just a matter of clicking back to the home page where the recipes button was prominently displayed.
2.	I found the app's features quite easy to access. The use of vibrant colours and clear, descriptive text throughout the app really stood out to me. It made each section easy to understand and the food images in the recipes section were particularly appealing, showing exactly how the dishes should look.
a.	Perhaps utilising different colours across the app might be efficient, or used to help make certain important aspects stand out more.

3.	The information provided by the app is quite comprehensive. It offers a robust description of exercises and recipes which I find quite adequate. It’s simple to follow and the clear display of steps, heart rate, calories, and exercises at the forefront is really user-friendly. Some parts could be simpler though. In terms of sleep tracking, simplifying the display by reducing the complexity of the 'rem', deep, and light sleep readings might make it more user-friendly. For calorie tracking, enhancing the colour scheme could make this section more visually engaging and informative, perhaps using colour alerts when exceeding calorie limits.
4.	The app's design is consistently simple and soothing.
a.	 The mental health and wellbeing section follows the same design ethos as the rest of the app, which helps in creating a seamless user experience.
b.	However, the hormonal health page could use a bit more colour to liven it up and make it more engaging.
5.	The personalisation and customisation features really boost my engagement. Being able to personalise my avatar makes the app feel more personal and engaging. I would suggest maybe adding more interactive social features to foster community interaction beyond just leaderboard competitions.
6.	The social aspects of the app are somewhat motivational. While the competitive element doesn’t appeal to everyone, introducing more community-oriented features, like social events or group challenges, could enhance motivation for users like me who see health as a personal journey rather than a competition.
a.	 I appreciate the option to remain anonymous or share details selectively. Health is a personal matter, and the app respects that by not pushing everyone into open social interactions.
7.	The rewards system is quite a motivator. It would be great if some rewards could even cover gym memberships, providing a real boost to maintain a healthy lifestyle.
a.	I'm particularly fond of the idea of earning vouchers for health-related achievements. 
8.	Support pages for mental and hormonal health are crucial motivators for me. Mental and hormonal health are deeply interlinked, and having reliable support through the app encourages me to use it regularly as part of managing my overall well-being.
9.	I’d rate the app’s ease of use quite highly, at an 8 out of 10.
a.	The only drawback I find is in the sleep tracker, which seems visually complicated and could be streamlined for better clarity.
10.	There’s a good balance between the app’s aesthetic appeal and usability. The app is well-designed, catering to a diverse range of users.
a.	One feature I find both appealing and useful is the recipes section. The visual representations not only look good but also make it easy to follow the recipes.
interview 12:
1.	Navigating the app is straightforward, but some screens feel overcrowded. It took me about half an hour to feel fully comfortable with the navigation due to some screens being cluttered.
a.	 I can easily access daily achievements from the dashboard, which is consistently located in the bottom left corner of the screen.
b.	Recipes are similarly easy to find by navigating to the dashboard.

2.	Understanding how to access the app's features was clear. The icons are very helpful.
a.	while colour is used as a guide, it could be utilised more effectively to enhance usability.
3.	The information provided by the app is sufficient and useful. The basic information meets my needs well. Maybe adding data like temperature or movement during sleep could provide deeper insights into sleep quality. Also, for diet tracking, incorporating features that track weight and dietary patterns in more detail would be beneficial.
4.	The design is generally consistent but varies in text density.
a.	 The mental well-being section aligns well with the rest of the app’s design.
b.	 The hormonal health section fits the overall theme, but the Yoga Exercises page is text-heavy and might benefit from being divided into smaller, more digestible sub-pages.
5.	The variety of exercises and personalised data enhance my engagement with the app. However, the dashboard often feels too cluttered upon opening. I think the home screen should focus more on displaying current progress more prominently to immediately grasp the user's achievements.
6.	The social features of the app are motivating. Being able to share and compare achievements and progress on my profile, as well as interact with friends, adds a valuable layer of motivation. The groups feature is particularly engaging.
a.	 Making social features optional is wise, allowing users to choose how much they want to engage publicly.
7.	The rewards system is motivating, but personal goals are more significant to me.
a.	The rewards that promote well-being and fitness are the ones I value most, as they align with my personal health goals.
8.	While I don’t frequently use the mental and hormonal health sections, I appreciate their availability. These sections add value by offering support when needed, contributing to a comprehensive health management tool.
9.	I’d rate the overall ease of use as a 6 out of 10.
a.	While the app layout is intuitive, some screens are too packed with information which hampers interactivity. Simplifying navigation by enhancing scrolling features and decluttering the dashboard could improve usability. The use of icons is helpful, but a better colour strategy could make navigation even more intuitive.
10.	The balance between aesthetic appeal and usability is not quite there. Sometimes, the minimalist design complicates usability because it's not always clear what certain elements of the app are meant for.
a.	The sleep tracker, however, stands out as both visually appealing and easy to use due to its effective use of colour and imagery.
Interview 13
1. I could navigate fairly easily due to clear icons and menu bar. It didn’t take me long. A minute? It was quite quick as there was a clear layout and so it was on a level of common sense .
a.    I clicked on the home button on the menu bar at the bottom and navigated to the icon which said “daily achievements”
b.     I clicked on home and selected the recipes buttong.
2. Like i said, the app contains clear icons and layout. Especially the home as a central hub. Icons and text are definitely most helpful.
a. I can’t really think of anything for improvement.
3.     	Yes it does motivate me. I think theres a cohesive design and good amount of information, which actually, gives me the vibe of a personal assistant. The fact that my understanding of fitness increases the more i use the app is a plus, since it gives advice as well, for example with the sleep tracker. For improvement, perhaps a chatbox to be added in the future might further help, but from my experience the current information is adequate for me to want to use it. I think the information itself is fine but i think an alarm could be added to help regulate sleep patterns more actively. Perhaps water intake would be useful. For me thats really important because if theres one thing i slack on, its my water intake. Just needs to be added otherwise the way to log and track info is easy in the calories section.
4.     	How consistent is the design throughout the app?
The design is pretty consistent. The colour scheme especially. I actually quite like the colour scheme since its not too harsh on the eyes, and it gives off a professional tone.
a.     	It does in terms of colour scheme and text.
b.     	Again it does in terms of colour scheme and text but i feel like it could have had similar buttons? The layout basically. For example if you compare the mindfulness button to the low intensity exercises button. They could have been the same shape and size in terms as buttons? It would have made it more cohesive but i mean, it works still. Maybe thats just a small detail on my part.
5.     	I mean customisation is very important to me. It allows me to get more involved in a way and add my own personal touch. I usually prefer apps that allow me to do this. A bonus - I think a daily streak feature would be great? I think that would motivate me to keep up with my goals. It adds a level of competitiveness against myself.
6.     	it motivates me as i like sharing my fitness goals with my friends. I think doing productive things with friends motivates me more, and its more fun that way too.
a. Yes its definitely effective. Everyones different. Some are more private and some aren’t.
7.     Its an incentive, but rewards is not as important to me personally. I prefer the social aspect to be honest with you.
a.     If i had to choose it would be wellbeing.
8.     Mental health is extremely important. Especially now, i think everyones becoming more aware how important fitness is to improve your mental health. Because of this link, that motivates me to use the app. and especially because mental health is one of the bigger things important to me.
9. 8
a. Can you explain your rating?
I think its pretty easy to use, maybe some information like graphs might be a bit tricky to get. Maybe if there was an option to change preferences on how you view progress?
10. Yes as the aesthetic is not too much, like not too harsh. Its got a soft colour scheme with a spaced out layout.
a. The menu bar is probably the best feature in terms of accessibility. Because im using it a lot, my understanding as i go through the app improves until it gets really easy. Thats why i mentioned it took me no time at all to learn how to use the app.
 interview 14:
1.I had a moderate level of difficulty navigating through the app. Took me maybe 10 minutes.

a.I was able to get to daily achievements from the sleep tracker, however the daily achievements button was not obvious.
b.I clicked on chat from the bottom row buttons then the friend list. Afterwards I clicked on the dashboard then on recipes. 
2. the icons helped me with navigating. 
a. I cant think of anything.

3. I have no complaints about the level of information, but it doesn’t motivate me to use the app more.
4. The app was very consistent. 
a. The appearance and the design compared to other pages was very familiar. 
b. The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. 
5. It does not motivate me to use it. 

6. It does not. I see no reason to include a social aspect for the app and i think it should be removed. 

a. I don’t think it is effective. Social aspects aren’t necessary.
7. It doesn’t motivate me.

a. No, I have no preference. 
8. It does not motivate me.

9.  6 out of 10. 

a. Some of the text is unnoticeable such as the average heart rate button due to background colour text. The back seems like something you can’t click on and requires a lot of concentration to notice. The heart rate monitor page was very confusing to navigate. In addition, text was very hard to read. 

10. No. The colour of the app is not very appealing and I found it very unattractive. Some text was hard to read due to the colour of it and background, showing a poor combination for reading. 

a. I couldn’t really find anything which appealed to me.

interview 15:
1.The app was very easy to navigate. It required minimum effort for me to do so. It took me maybe 5 minutes to understand.

a.I clicked on the dashboard then I checked on the daily achievements button on the top right. 
b.I clicked on the dashboard then I clicked on view recipes. 
2. Icons mostly helped, but some buttons were not clear that they were buttons. For example the dashboard buttons such as today’s steps and that row.

a. perhaps make some icons more clear.
3. It doesn’t motivate me to use it, the amount of information shown on some pages made me feel overwhelmed.
4. The app was very consistent. 
a. All of the pages that I have view looks very consistent and similar. 
b.The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. 
5. It does not motivate me. However, I see why it would motivate others to use it. I do think the chat and recipes feel unnecessary. Would only use apps for fitness. Does too many things at once, quality over quantity.

6. I can see myself getting motivated through competition.

a.	Keeping privacy is essential.

7. Rewards would motivate me a lot, specifically the discount. Would make me exercise a lot. 

a.	Discounts to shopping. Don’t care about avatar customization.

8. It is important in the current day to balance your overall health, it is not only about physical health. So it would definitely motivate me.

9. 8 out of 10. 

a. Some pages are unclear, mainly the heart rate monitor and sometimes buttons are too small. However, the button row I really like because in case I get lost I know how to go back. Where there are pages with not too much information I feel it is good. 

10. Yes for sure, I like the consistency in design, but some pages put too many buttons/information into a page, making it a bit overwhelming.
a. I really like the bottom row buttons in case I get lost and I can backtrack to the main page, they’re also very understandable and stand out.




Interview 16:

1.Navigation was easy. Probably 2 minutes.
a. I was able to complete the task but it requires backtracking.

b. I was able to complete the task but it requires backtracking.
2. It did not take me long to fully understand it as the app pages were quite consistent. The colours and the format was simple and had a constant display. This helped me navigate the app quite well. 
a.	The heart rate monitor was very confusing and needs improvement.

3.	The app contained too much information which made me feel overwhelmed. I don't think additional information should be included. I think some information should be discarded as I found that the user interface showed too much. I think information should be excluded including the graphs. The page on sleep tracker for example should only focus on the essentials and information should be limited. But calorie tracking should include non-exercise calories burnt too.

4. Very consistent. (everything is one colour)

a. The appearance and the design of it is familiar to others. 
b.The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. However the icons are uncentered. 
5. It does not motivate me to use it. If anything, it makes the app very text heavy. Information should be limited and focus only on the important aspects. 

6. it doesn’t motivate me.

a. I don’t think it is effective. It isn’t necessary to begin with.
7. it doesn’t motivate me.

a. I like the discounts to food supplements. 
8. It does not motivate me.

9.  6 out of 10. 

a. The app contains too much text. The layout is also busy and the icons are not easy to follow. Also, the only way to backtrack is though the buttons on the bottom row. I believe pages on the app should include additional backtracking options.
10. moderately. Use of more colour could help, along with less text.
a. The buttons work and are obvious to see and hard to misclick. However, the app is very plain and chunky and backtracking is not easy. However, the app has a lot of wanted features. The rewards page seems intuitive for its layout and content, it’s very clear and to the point.

Interview 1:
1.    Quite easily, I got comfortable navigating the app in just about 2 minutes. It's very intuitive.
a.    Navigating was quite easy for me. To check my daily achievements from the sleep tracker, I simply used the dashboard link. It's all very well connected and user-friendly.
b.  To move from the friends list to the recipes, I went back to the dashboard first and then selected recipes. It’s pretty straightforward.
2.  I understood how to access all the features right away. It’s quite self-explanatory and was in line with apps I’ve used previously. I think this app design is quite clear and user friendly which helps massively. The icons and text are very clear and guide you through the process smoothly. The design really helps in figuring out what to do next without any hassle.
a. I’m quite content with how the app is already, I honestly don’t know what you could add to improve it!
3. The information provided by the app is definitely sufficient for my needs. As someone interested in tracking daily activity and meeting fitness goals this app provides me with a lot of information. I particularly like the mental health and yoga aspects as that’s what I am really interested in at the moment. The different features and information are very insightful. It motivates me to use the app more because I love how it integrates all the data and presents it in an engaging way. Seeing tangible evidence of my progress inspires me to keep going. Although, maybe variations in macros according to different diets could be considered as an automated process but this is quite small and not at all the most necessary of things to consider.
4.    Very consistent.
a.    The design elements like colour scheme, typography, and layout are very consistent across the app including the mental health and wellbeing section. This consistency provides a sense of familiarity and ease of use.
b.   The hormonal health page adheres to the same design principles as the rest of the app, maintaining a uniform look and feel which helps in user navigation and reduces cognitive load.
5.  The app's ability to personalise my experience, particularly through customisable workout plans and dashboard settings, greatly enhances my motivation. It feels like the app is tailored to meet my personal fitness goals. It’s very inclusive and insightful and caters for a wide range of users.
6.  They motivate me to use the app more, I am able to check friend’s progress and leaderboards. It helps me challenge myself and set goals that I previously wouldn’t have. I gain inspiration for new challenges and work to improve my overall fitness by staying up to date with fitness and health trends. The flipside to this however is that I feel sometimes I may push myself a bit too hard or feel bad for not being able to perform as well as others which could be a little demotivating. However, I would say if integrating social media and so forth, it may be wise to think about security or people who may feel discouraged due to comparing their workouts with athletes. In this sense, maybe the social media/ leaderboard and challenges feature can be made inactive unless chosen otherwise in settings perhaps.
a.    Yes, most definitely and this relates heavily to my previous point where not everyone wants to share their progress or follow others. It leads to a very competitive environment which can be less conducive for health goal achievement. Privacy is preferred by some and this works well for them.
7.   I’d love to get 50% off on boots! Rewards are a great way to keep motivation high and people engaged on their health journey’s knowing that they have something to look forward to when they meet their goals. So they have an added bonus of an extra reward for meeting their goals.
a. Not really! If I had to be quite specific, I love shopping so any shopping rewards. For the app itself, being able to change features, customise the avatar will be a great way but that’s not something I’m personally all that interested in and I don’t think I’d go out of my way to change hair shades etc.
8.  It gives me more confidence; I think there’s a big focus on how hormones and mental health influence one's fitness journey. Having that information to hand that is incredible and insightful can result in bettering one's health and fitness outlook on their own journey I think it's a great way to educate people so they can get the most out of their workouts and their health overall.
9. 9.5
a. Everything is easily accessible and encourages users of all ages to use the app.  the app is great because it encompasses a range of different features trying to cater for a diverse range of users. There is a comprehensive list of different workouts that one can pick from there's also the option to create a personalised fitness plan which I think is great therefore it gets a 9.5. I think because this is just a design at the moment there's a few things to maybe consider therefore I don't want to give it a 10.
10. Yes definitely. I think the colours used are great there is a range of information that is displayed well I think one thing to consider is the amount of information being put onto 1 screen and how this would work for people who use glasses or are trying to read it on the go I think those are things to consider but for myself personally it works really well I think everything I need is there.
a. I liked the sleep tab the most. The layout is simple and effective. Definitely makes me want to regulate my sleep using the app. Sleep is the one thing that I've struggled with quite a bit so being able to track this on a platform that's quite accessible and displays information in an easy to read format I think will be very useful in being able to regulate my sleep.

Interview 2:
1. I could regulate through the app very easily! I think it's a really great looking app that is trying to be quite holistic with articles that could help as well as a social media aspect which also ties into its main function of tracking activity and providing health metrics. I became comfortable with navigating through the app fairly quickly, maybe within 5 minutes? I'd say the areas that took me a bit longer were pages where there were small intricate different icons or lots of different information but otherwise it was quite intuitive and fairly straightforward to understand how to log a new workout or access the sleep tracking for example.

a.    This was a fairly simple process I I understood how this would be used, because I've used a fitness app before I predominantly use my Apple Watch but I knew that I just needed to access the main home screen or dashboard, whatever you want to call it, and then just navigate from there
b.    The quickest way that I was able to navigate to view recipes from the front list was just through the dashboard there's a control panel at the bottom which makes it quite easy to navigate across the different key screens so I think it was it was fairly simple.
2. I would say I really like the icons and the colour scheme is great, the icons made it really easy for me to know what to expect and where to go honestly.
A. the text is one area which I think could be improved possibly just because on some of the pages there's a lot of information in particular like the hormone information page so maybe being able to personalise this to enlarge the text that would be really good.
I also wasn't sure if there's an immersive reader function so maybe that's something to look into unless I'm mistaken. The ability to change fonts of the text being displayed I think just making it quite customisable and the ability to personalise the app as much as possible would be amazing already allow some functionality with this but I'm just thinking just to make it a touch more personal. 
3. I think the app provides a good amount of information if anything I would say maybe it has a lot of information for the type of app it should be but then again that's just my preference I feel there may be people who like to read through bunches of information like it's provided in the articles I personally don't so that's just my opinion. I know that being able to look at my progress over time and getting detailed information on this is very motivating though!
I think if you really wanted to push it however you could maybe look at ram cycles and time spent in deep sleep but I don't know if that would be quite measurable on just a normal phone based app measurable in any way you'd probably need a fitness watch or something like that.
4. How consistent is the design throughout the app?
I think just looking at the app you can tell that the design is quite consistent there are some areas that need improvement for example information pages seem to a little bit different to the main design but overall I think those are just small tweaks that may need to be made or if it's been done on purpose doesn't really make sense so may need to be fixed.
a.    No and this is what I was trying to explain in previous points where there are some variations and I suppose it's something that you wouldn't necessarily pick on or you wouldn't really notice unless you have really paying attention but there definitely is a difference in the well-being section supposed to the workout section for example where the app has a consistent design on most pages it differs on these specific pages. If you think about it in the ground scheme of things perhaps this doesn't really matter but considering that you're creating an app which is part of a brand and an identity having that cohesive design throughout it is quite important from my knowledge and use of other apps it just ensures consistency and it means that you know how and where to use certain things and view information in a certain way.
b.    Likewise, I would say the same exact thing for this page as I have above the well-being pages are differing to the main pages of the app.
5. I think this is a quite positive aspect of the app, having the opportunity to personalise and customise the app means that you can make it to suit your needs which is something that I've always appreciated in other apps that I've used and I think because this is in line with your own fitness journey having that personalisation means that it's your own app is tracking your own metrics and it just makes you even more motivated to use it because you know you'll like what you're seeing.
6. Do the social aspects of the app motivate you to use it more, e.g. social media, friends list, leaderboard?
I'm a very private person so I don't tend to go onto social media to to follow friends or have any interest in the leaderboard I can see the appeal to this for a lot of people and younger generations who would want to compare their workouts to others but for myself I know what routine I like to follow what workouts I want to do so it doesn't really appeal to me. Although I suppose the idea of meeting new people with similar goals, exchanging experiences and the leaderboard for some friendly competition. 
a.    Yes, most definitely. more privacy is ideal, being able to pick and choose what you want to share or not and what you want to view or not for example. perhaps this would make me want to use it but overall I would say I have a lack of interest in this in this feature.
7.  I love the ideas of rewards and incentives it just means that I have something else to work towards apart from just looking and feeling great so for example vouchers or something to build in the app would be a great way to kind of gamify the experience of having to work out and prioritise health. 
a.    I think character customisation is a really great reward type it's something that I would definitely be interested in just seeing the different things that you could potentially get and utilised would be a good idea especially if there's something in particular that I really wanted as part of the character customisation that I could really work for it to try and achieve it this may not be everybody's cup of tea but it's something that I would be interested in.
8. I think it's a fab idea I think this is something that will really help a lot of people for myself in particular as a female, hormonal health is something that's only just being given importance and highlighted as an issue in society so knowing that there's information that I can access as part of this app which is reliable and insightful could mean that I am more equipped in shaping my workouts or the nutrition aspect of my fitness lifestyle.
9. 9
a. Just.. very easy to use. Straight forward, everything is explained with icons and text, really easy to get to it and figure it out. I think it also has amazing features which you would expect in a fitness app the only reason why it's not a 10 is purely because it's got features like social media which I don't think I'd need and this could potentially make the app a little bit more clunky but otherwise it's great the way that it's sectioned out its navigation is very easy and intuitive as mentioned previously.
10. Yes, leaning towards ease of use. I think there's a very good balance between aesthetic appeal and needs of use the icons are very clear to understand it's your typical fitness app but very customisable very personalisable which makes it even more enticing to use I can definitely see it encouraging me to stay consistent with my nutrition and my working out.
 
a. Recipes, daily achievements, rewards, all have an easy to understand layout and are visually captivating to me, motivating me to use the app more.
 
 interview 3:
 
1. the app was quite easy to navigate & memorise it's different trackers. Took around 3 mins
a.    From the sleep tracker page, on the bottom left you will see a house-like icon called "Dashboard", then on the Dashboard page on the top right you will see "Daily achievements", click on it & it'll take you to the achievements page.
b.    From friends list page, on the bottom left you will see "Dashboard", tab it & you see the recipes on the page underneath the strength workout option
2. Icons, they were easy to understand even for my first time using it. Ex: Chatbox like icon for yours chats. I think the icons being so clear makes it easy for users to be able to go back and easily navigate where they're not having to physically have to look at the page and figure out where to go next it's quite intuitive where you know that the home screen will be in the same page on what the icon is for it so you can just click as opposed to having to look read and then click which would take time and kind of deterred users from using the app so that's something that I really liked.
A.  My biggest issue is the Dashboard page, that page on it's own has way too many things in it, Food Recipes? Dashboard, Workout or Sleep tracker? Dashboard! And much much more which makes it seem like anything not on Dashboard doesn't seem that important.
3. shows the information that I want, but I wish i could control which and what information want from the app's trackers. Motivates me personally, but I can imagine other users wishing for more information or less. For sleep tracking though, a suggestion would be perhaps copying an athlete's sleeping schedules would be a good starting point for new users who want to have a healthier sleep.  Actual information on sleeping habits and the importance of getting a particular amount of sleep for different age ranges, female/ male can be quite helpful in helping users with their sleep and this is something that could elevate the app a little bit more.
4. From scale 1 to 10 I'd give it a 7 my point still stands, dashboard contains almost everything for the app, for me personally I believe that it makes the other icons feel or unnecessary barely used for the day to day use
a.   Yes, for the most part but there is some small differences to make the pages look and feel unique.
b.    Same answer, same design when needed and some changes here and there to make it feel & look unique to it's category
5. Yes, customisation will always make me use an app more often because it makes me feel like I'm using something I designed.
6. very motivating. Not only chatting with people trying to improve their health motivates me but I can also get advices from other people. I think chatting with people based to specific topics could be more motivating, for example talking a couple of people in a chatroom dedicated to healthier sleep
a.  Yes & no. Yes, it can be quite easy to talk to people who doesn't know you to talk about your weight to example. No, anonymity in an online app will never end well.
7.  Open the app, get your daily reward and then you are done. Sounds good to make people use the app everyday more I feel like it can be used to more things such as changing app colours with reward coins...etc.
a.    More customisation is always the answer for me, changing apps colour, chatrooms background, profile background that can be visible to other users...etc.
8. not personally for me but I’m a big advocate for promoting holistic wellbeing.
9.  8
a. It's easy to navigate and understand while looks good enough to be a visually good looking app.
10.  Yes. the visual appeal and the ease of usage makes the app a good experience, there doesn’t seem to be one overpowering the other either. 
a. Sleep tracker’s visuals and different colours for it charts is probably my personal favourite, really helps me understand what’s going on in my sleep in a friendly way.
interview 4:
 
1. The navigation process involved moving through various submenus which, while numerous, were logically organised. It took me about an hour of use to become fully comfortable and familiar with the layout and navigation paths.
a.    To switch from monitoring my sleep to checking my daily achievements, I started on the sleep tracker page and pressed the 'dashboard/home' button, which is always visible for easy access. Once on the dashboard, the daily achievements option was prominently displayed at the top right of the page, making it simple to find and select.
b.    From the friends list, which I accessed through my profile, I returned to the dashboard by pressing the 'dashboard/home' button, a consistent element across all pages. The Recipes option was located centrally at the bottom of the dashboard, making it straightforward to move between these features 
2. The app's design uses text labels and icons effectively, which helped me understand how to access its features. The icons are intuitive, but the use of uniform colours for context buttons under the same theme sometimes made it difficult to quickly distinguish different functions
a.  To improve, differentiating button colours or adding unique design elements could help users distinguish between features more rapidly
3. The app provides a high level of detailed information which is great for tracking various health metrics. The richness of the data available makes the app particularly useful for those who are serious about monitoring their health, it’s a great motivator for me. Although introducing categories of sleep types based on the data collected could help users understand their sleep patterns better, perhaps by offering insights into what certain sleep behaviours’ indicate about their overall health. Maybe also incorporating a feature to scan nutritional labels or allow manual entry of dietary information would also work. This could help users better understand their calorie intake and nutritional habits, making the tracking process more interactive and informative.
4. I would say all around consistent, with some variations here and there.
a.    The design of the mental health and wellbeing section closely mirrors that of the hormonal health page, maintaining a consistent aesthetic and functional approach which helps in user adaptation and comfort But I’ve noticed, these differs slightly to the other pages.
b.    Like the mental health section, it maintains the overall design theme, which is clean and user-friendly, contributing to a cohesive user experience across the app
5.   A custom avatar would be nice to have, especially if the avatar reflected your current "fitness". Currently, the avatar function does not seem very engaging. 
6. Being able to share workout results and dietary habits with friends adds an element of fun and encouragement. However, sharing dietary data can sometimes feel less appealing than sharing fitness achievements.
a.    Do you feel keeping social aspects optional and having anonymity in the app is effective?
 Keeping social features optional and allowing for anonymity is effective because it caters to users who prefer privacy, which can make the app more inclusive
7. it definitely seems an encouraging aspect, it’d sure work on me! It has a lot of categories I am interested in as well, and I like its inclusivity of categories.
a.  Character customisation features are particularly appealing as rewards. They add a fun and personalised touch to the app, making the rewards feel more substantial and desirable
8. The support pages like those for mental health and hormonal health are very helpful. They provide actionable advice and support that motivates me to regularly use the app and follow through with the exercises and tips offered
9. 7
a. While the home button efficiently navigates back to the dashboard, the multiple menus require some exploration, which can be a bit overwhelming at first
10. The app strikes a good balance between looking visually appealing and being user-friendly, I feel like it utilises both to be effective honestly
A. One feature that stands out is the scrolling page, which would enhance accessibility by allowing users to view more content easily without navigating away from the page.
 


interview 5:
1. It only took me a few seconds, like 30 seconds maybe max, to get the hang of it. The app works a lot like other apps I’ve used, so it felt familiar.
a.    Getting from the sleep tracker to check my daily achievements was simple. I just clicked on the dashboard and found everything I needed right there.
b.    To get from my friends list to the recipes, I clicked the dashboard button at the bottom right and then picked the recipes option. It was all pretty straightforward.
2. The buttons to move around the app are easy to spot and use. They’re big and clear, so I always knew where to click.
a. there are no improvements that I can think of to make this design aspect better as I really like it.
3.  the details the app gives me about my health are really helpful. It shows me things that encourage me to keep a healthier lifestyle. It would be good if the app could explain more about what the sleep numbers mean though. Like, telling me what a good sleep pattern looks like. Also, maybe it might help if there was a way to see more about what's in my food, like being able to scan a food label to see what nutrients I'm getting.
4. the consistency is there, I can definitely say!
a.  The look of the app feels the same everywhere, even in the mental health section. It’s smooth and everything fits together well.
b.   The same here, it has a streamlined design with the rest of the features
5.  I like being able to change things like my dashboard or what my avatar looks like. It might be even better if I could use a real picture of myself instead of just a cartoon.
6.  it’s fun to see how my friends are doing and to show them my progress too. It makes me want to use the app more.
a.    I think it’s good that you don’t have to share everything if you don’t want to. You can keep some things private or share with people you don’t know without them knowing who you are.
7.  I love it, especially when it gives me things that go well with staying fit, like gear from sports brands.
a.    fitness and wellbeing for sure
8. - These pages are really helpful. They make the app more friendly and supportive, which makes me want to use it more.
9. - 8
a. it’s mostly easy to use, but the design is pretty basic and doesn’t always grab my attention.
10. - The app looks nice and it’s easy to use, but it doesn’t really stand out from other apps. Adding something unique could make it more interesting.
a. sleep tracker had a nice set of visuals that were easy to understand for me, with the right amount of text supporting it.
interview 6 
 
1.  	I got the hang of the app’s navigation really quickly, within just a minute or so. The interface is clean and straightforward, very much in line with other modern apps, which helped me adapt quickly.
a.      When I wanted to check my achievements after tracking my sleep, I simply clicked the dashboard button, which is centrally located and easy to access. The daily achievements section was prominently displayed, making it easy to find.
b.      Similarly, when I was on the friends list and wanted to look at recipes, I just hit the same dashboard button, and from there, recipes were one of the main options. It’s nicely laid out so I can't miss it.
2.  	Understanding how to access the app's features came easily to me due to the clarity of the text, the intuitive icons, and the smart use of colours (although similar due to the theme settings) all contribute significantly. The text is always clear and concise, which helps a lot when navigating through different features.
a. I can’t really think of anything to improve it, it’s ideal for me.
3.  	The app provides just the right amount of information, making it effective and not overwhelming.  It’s packed with useful details and functionalities that cover everything from fitness tracking to dietary suggestions, exactly what I need from a health app.
4.  	The design consistency across the app enhances its aesthetic appeal and user experience.
a.      Every page, whether it’s about mental wellness or physical health, maintains a consistent theme and layout, which makes the transition between sections seamless.
b.      The hormonal health page is just as well-designed as the rest of the app, with all elements matching the overall style, reinforcing the user’s comfort with navigating through different sections.
5.  	The personalisation and customisation features greatly increase my engagement with the app.  Being able to tweak the dashboards and change my avatar keeps the experience fresh and engaging. I find myself logging in more often just to see and use the new customisations I’ve unlocked.
6.  	Social features significantly boost my motivation to engage with the app.  The leaderboard and ability to see my friends' progress introduce a fun, competitive edge that drives me to keep up and even excel. It transforms routine tracking into a more social, shared experience.
a. anonymity is definitely a requirement – people need to be safe out there!
7.  	The rewards system effectively encourages continual use of the app.
a.      I am particularly drawn to rewards that enhance my wellbeing or offer retail discounts, aligning perfectly with my lifestyle and interests.
8.  	Educational content on health topics provided by the app boosts my motivation to maintain healthy habits. It’s really useful. It offers practical advice that goes beyond general knowledge, helping me to apply what I learn directly to my daily routine.
9.  	I rate the app’s usability as absolutely top-notch – 10.
a.      It's so intuitive that I felt almost instantly at ease. The layout is logical, and the features are accessible right from the get-go, which makes navigating through the app a breese.
10.  The app strikes a perfect balance between being visually appealing and easy to use, I’ve had no troubles throughout and was very impressed by the colours and visual aids.
a.      Particularly, the dashboard design is both attractive and functional. It’s easy on the eyes and simplifies access to various features, making everyday interactions enjoyable and efficient.
 
interview 7:
1.	 It took me about 10 minutes to really get comfortable with navigating through the app.
o	 A.Initially, I found navigation a bit confusing because I thought the achievements linked to the sleep tracker would be in the same section. Instead, I had to go to the dashboard and then select daily achievements. 
o	B.  Once I figured out that the dashboard serves as the home menu, navigation became much quicker.
2.	 Accessing different features was quite straightforward. The app uses a consistent colour scheme and the fonts are clear, which definitely helps with usability and accessibility.
a.	I can’t really think of anything, maybe for the icons to be highlighted when you’re on that specific page?

3.	 The information provided does motivate me to use the app more because it's not overwhelming and gives me just enough to work with without feeling overloaded. To be a bit critical though, the visual representation of 'remaining calories' could be improved by using a pie chart to help users visualise their data better.
4.	 The overall design of the app is quite consistent, although the images used throughout could be more uniform.
o	a. Initially, the images' style seemed to differ notably from those in the rest of the app, which was a bit jarring.
o	b. hormonal health seemed more in line with the rest of the app, following colour scheme and icon style.
5.	  I appreciate that the dashboard displays the most crucial information upfront—it's a straightforward approach that works well. However, some users might prefer a more visually appealing interface, given the competition with other apps.
6.	  Personally, I don't find the competitive aspects of health tracking via social features motivating because I don’t view health as a competition. However, I can see how this could motivate others by creating a sense of accountability.
o	a. Keeping social aspects optional and providing anonymity is effective because it allows users who are less competitive to engage with the app without feeling pressured.

7.	Yes, the rewards system does motivate me, although rewarding with something like Nando's seems counterintuitive for a health app!
a.	With that being said, food!
8.	The mental and hormonal health support pages don’t particularly motivate me as they are more reflective and don’t align with my reasons for using the app. I generally don’t use the app for deep self-reflection.
9. I’d rate the app’s ease of use as a 6 out of 10. 
a. There’s quite a bit to navigate through, but it's relatively straightforward for anyone who's somewhat tech-savvy.
10.  The app strikes a good balance between looking decent and being functional. It’s not too flashy, which is good because it makes navigation simple and keeps the focus on functionality.
a. probably the achievements page, I think it had a unique and effective way of showing users what achievements they have and what they have yet to receive.

interview 8:
1.	Navigating the app was straightforward for me. I understood how to navigate it right from the start. The layout was intuitive and user-friendly.
a. When I needed to check my achievements, I easily navigated back to the dashboard and simply pressed the achievements button.
b. To look at recipes, I went from the dashboard directly to the recipes section.
2. I had no trouble understanding how to access the app's different features. The text throughout the app is clear and direct, which helps a lot in guiding me through various sections.
a. I cant think of anything.
3.	The information provided by the app is ample and very useful, it would really be beneficial for myself who’s still a bit new to this. The sleep pages and hormonal health sections offer a lot of personalised information for example which is great for understanding my health needs and getting appropriate support. It would be helpful to add information about how long after eating I should go to bed to promote healthier habits, or including a feature to scan products to get calorie content directly would make tracking my dietary intake much easier and more accurate.
4.	The design of the app is impressively consistent.
a.	a. Yes, the overall design is consistent, which makes the app aesthetically pleasing and easy to use.
b.	The use of consistent colours throughout helps maintain a seamless experience across hormonal health.
5.	The app's personalisation and customisation options significantly increase my motivation, particularly the ability to use coins for purchasing avatar outfits and vouchers. It would also be great to track weight loss over specific periods as an added feature.
6.	Social aspects add an exciting layer of motivation. The app feels more engaging because it allows me to compare my progress with friends, which adds a level of excitement and competition.
a.	Keeping social aspects optional and ensuring anonymity is effective because it allows those who value privacy to use the app without pressure.
7.	The rewards system effectively incentivises continued use of the app.
a.	a. I particularly enjoy the rewards that involve character customisation and food-related incentives, which align well with my interests.
8.	Support pages on mental and hormonal health positively impact my fitness routine. Understanding these aspects helps me relax more while exercising, which enhances my overall wellness and effectiveness of workouts.
9.	On a scale of 1 to 10, the app’s ease of use is a solid 10.
a.	a. The clear text and well-organised sections make it incredibly easy to navigate and understand what each part of the app does.
10.	There is a good balance between aesthetic appeal and usability – I didn’t find myself getting lost and was engaged throughout.
a.	a. The dashboard not only looks good but also functions effectively as a central hub for accessing various features, making the app both attractive and practical to use.
 interview 9:
1.	Navigating through the app was incredibly easy for me. Honestly, it only took me about two seconds to understand how to navigate through the app. The design is very intuitive.
a.	a. I could easily move from one feature to another by pressing just a few buttons; the process required minimal steps and was really straightforward.
b.	b. This was the same case when moving from the sleep section to viewing achievements or recipes—it was all very seamless.
2.	The language used in the app made it easy to understand each section. The text was clear and concise, which helped a lot in quickly understanding what each section was for and how to use it.
a.	Maybe implementing different colours might be more eyecatching for various situations.
3.	The information provided by the app is sufficient and well-integrated. I really appreciate how the mental well-being aspects are integrated with the exercise and recipe sections—it creates a holistic health experience. I think the level of detail is just right; it provides everything I need without being overwhelming. A feature to scan products and automatically log calories that way would additionally be incredibly useful for tracking nutritional intake effortlessly.

4.	The design of the app is consistent and visually pleasing. The app uses very colourful and soft tones throughout, which make it attractive and easy on the eyes.
a.	Perhaps some differences here and there, but I can still tell the mental health pages belong to the same app!
b.	This design consistency extends to hormonal health for sure, creating a relaxing and enjoyable user experience.
5.	The app’s gamification elements significantly enhance my motivation. It makes me feel like I’m playing a game, where I can compete in a friendly manner and have goals to level up my avatar. This feature encourages me to put in my best effort to achieve my health goals.

6.	Social features enhance the app’s engagement for me. Seeing other people’s journeys and progress is inspiring and adds an enjoyable social aspect to my health and fitness routine.
a.	 Having the option to keep some aspects of my activity private or to share them anonymously is great because it accommodates users who might feel shy or embarrassed about sharing their progress.
7.	The rewards system is a powerful incentive to use the app regularly.
a.	a. The character customisation rewards are particularly fun because they allow me to make my avatar look as good as I want, reflecting my real-life health achievements.
8.	The support pages enhance my exercise routine by reducing stress and improving mental clarity. This support allows me to focus more on my exercises with a better state of mind, enhancing the effectiveness of my workouts.
9.	I would rate the app's ease of use as a perfect 10.
a.	a. Its usability is top-notch, similar to other apps in terms of easy navigation and recognisable layout, which makes it extremely user-friendly.
10.	The app has a great aesthetic appeal and is easy to use. Its visual design is so appealing—it could be something I’d use as a background on my phone. The soft tones are soothing, which makes the app not just functional but also a pleasure to use.
a. The dashboard in particular, it really utilises both visual appeal and is versatile to help everyone navigate.
interview 10:
1.	Navigating the app was surprisingly easy and straightforward, I experienced very little to no issues identifying different features. It only took me maybe 5 minutes to get comfortable with the app's layout and navigation. Everything was logically laid out, which made the experience smooth.
a. I found accessing the daily achievements from the sleep tracker quite intuitive. The sleep tracker was prominently displayed on the home page with an appealing moon and clouds icon, making it easy to spot. From there, accessing the information was just a matter of switching it on.
b. To switch from viewing the friends list to checking out recipes, all I needed to do was tap on the dashboard button. It served as a central hub, simplifying my navigation.
2.	I found the app’s features easy to access and understand. The icons, combined with clear, straightforward text, were particularly helpful. The visual representation, like drawings and diagrams of exercises, enhanced my understanding and made the app engaging.
a.	No suggestions here!

3.	The information provided by the app felt adequate for my needs. The variety of exercises and the detailed tracking system, including coins and awards, really motivated me to engage more with the app. For improvement though, in the sleep tracker, perhaps simplifying the charts could help. They are a bit complex and could be more user-friendly. And maybe for calorie tracking, adding a feature that alerts users in colours like red when they go over their daily calorie limit would be a practical enhancement.
4.	The design consistency across the app is striking.
a. The mental health and wellbeing section follows the same visual theme as the rest of the app, but it could benefit from additional details or diagrams to enrich the content.
b. The hormonal health page maintains the consistent theme with the same visual style, ensuring a cohesive experience.
5.	The personalisation and customisation features greatly enhance my motivation. Being able to tailor aspects like dashboards and avatars makes the app feel more personal and directly relevant to my needs.
6.	Social features add a significant motivational boost. The leaderboard and the ability to see how I stack up against friends bring a fun, competitive edge that makes the app more engaging.
a.	Keeping these features optional and allowing for anonymity is crucial. It gives everyone the freedom to choose how much they want to share, catering to different comfort levels regarding privacy.
7.	The rewards system is highly motivating. The flexibility to earn rewards for various achievements is a great incentive.
a.	 I particularly appreciate rewards related to health and well-being, like gym memberships or health food vouchers.
8.	Support pages like those on mental and hormonal health play a crucial role in my routine. They remind me to take care of my mental well-being, which is essential for overall health. This makes me want to keep checking the app to stay on track.
9.	I’d rate the app’s ease of use as a 9 out of 10.
a.	The app is straightforward to navigate and follow, much like popular social media apps, which makes it very user-friendly.
10.	There’s a good balance between the app’s aesthetic appeal and its functionality. The design is not only visually appealing but also effectively organised, making features easy to access.
a.	The sections dealing with different health aspects are particularly well done, as they are not just informative but also easy to reach and use.

interview 11:
1.	Navigating through the app was quite intuitive and easy for me, I knew what to click and move to just purely based on previous fitness app experience and usage. It didn't take me long to get the hang of navigating around; I'd say I was comfortable within just 2 minutes.
a. While using the sleep tracker, I noticed lots of useful tips on improving sleep, complete with a detailed sleep chart. To check my daily achievements, I just had to head back to the dashboard.
b. From the friends list, accessing recipes was just a matter of clicking back to the home page where the recipes button was prominently displayed.
2.	I found the app's features quite easy to access. The use of vibrant colours and clear, descriptive text throughout the app really stood out to me. It made each section easy to understand and the food images in the recipes section were particularly appealing, showing exactly how the dishes should look.
a.	Perhaps utilising different colours across the app might be efficient, or used to help make certain important aspects stand out more.

3.	The information provided by the app is quite comprehensive. It offers a robust description of exercises and recipes which I find quite adequate. It’s simple to follow and the clear display of steps, heart rate, calories, and exercises at the forefront is really user-friendly. Some parts could be simpler though. In terms of sleep tracking, simplifying the display by reducing the complexity of the 'rem', deep, and light sleep readings might make it more user-friendly. For calorie tracking, enhancing the colour scheme could make this section more visually engaging and informative, perhaps using colour alerts when exceeding calorie limits.
4.	The app's design is consistently simple and soothing.
a.	 The mental health and wellbeing section follows the same design ethos as the rest of the app, which helps in creating a seamless user experience.
b.	However, the hormonal health page could use a bit more colour to liven it up and make it more engaging.
5.	The personalisation and customisation features really boost my engagement. Being able to personalise my avatar makes the app feel more personal and engaging. I would suggest maybe adding more interactive social features to foster community interaction beyond just leaderboard competitions.
6.	The social aspects of the app are somewhat motivational. While the competitive element doesn’t appeal to everyone, introducing more community-oriented features, like social events or group challenges, could enhance motivation for users like me who see health as a personal journey rather than a competition.
a.	 I appreciate the option to remain anonymous or share details selectively. Health is a personal matter, and the app respects that by not pushing everyone into open social interactions.
7.	The rewards system is quite a motivator. It would be great if some rewards could even cover gym memberships, providing a real boost to maintain a healthy lifestyle.
a.	I'm particularly fond of the idea of earning vouchers for health-related achievements. 
8.	Support pages for mental and hormonal health are crucial motivators for me. Mental and hormonal health are deeply interlinked, and having reliable support through the app encourages me to use it regularly as part of managing my overall well-being.
9.	I’d rate the app’s ease of use quite highly, at an 8 out of 10.
a.	The only drawback I find is in the sleep tracker, which seems visually complicated and could be streamlined for better clarity.
10.	There’s a good balance between the app’s aesthetic appeal and usability. The app is well-designed, catering to a diverse range of users.
a.	One feature I find both appealing and useful is the recipes section. The visual representations not only look good but also make it easy to follow the recipes.
interview 12:
1.	Navigating the app is straightforward, but some screens feel overcrowded. It took me about half an hour to feel fully comfortable with the navigation due to some screens being cluttered.
a.	 I can easily access daily achievements from the dashboard, which is consistently located in the bottom left corner of the screen.
b.	Recipes are similarly easy to find by navigating to the dashboard.

2.	Understanding how to access the app's features was clear. The icons are very helpful.
a.	while colour is used as a guide, it could be utilised more effectively to enhance usability.
3.	The information provided by the app is sufficient and useful. The basic information meets my needs well. Maybe adding data like temperature or movement during sleep could provide deeper insights into sleep quality. Also, for diet tracking, incorporating features that track weight and dietary patterns in more detail would be beneficial.
4.	The design is generally consistent but varies in text density.
a.	 The mental well-being section aligns well with the rest of the app’s design.
b.	 The hormonal health section fits the overall theme, but the Yoga Exercises page is text-heavy and might benefit from being divided into smaller, more digestible sub-pages.
5.	The variety of exercises and personalised data enhance my engagement with the app. However, the dashboard often feels too cluttered upon opening. I think the home screen should focus more on displaying current progress more prominently to immediately grasp the user's achievements.
6.	The social features of the app are motivating. Being able to share and compare achievements and progress on my profile, as well as interact with friends, adds a valuable layer of motivation. The groups feature is particularly engaging.
a.	 Making social features optional is wise, allowing users to choose how much they want to engage publicly.
7.	The rewards system is motivating, but personal goals are more significant to me.
a.	The rewards that promote well-being and fitness are the ones I value most, as they align with my personal health goals.
8.	While I don’t frequently use the mental and hormonal health sections, I appreciate their availability. These sections add value by offering support when needed, contributing to a comprehensive health management tool.
9.	I’d rate the overall ease of use as a 6 out of 10.
a.	While the app layout is intuitive, some screens are too packed with information which hampers interactivity. Simplifying navigation by enhancing scrolling features and decluttering the dashboard could improve usability. The use of icons is helpful, but a better colour strategy could make navigation even more intuitive.
10.	The balance between aesthetic appeal and usability is not quite there. Sometimes, the minimalist design complicates usability because it's not always clear what certain elements of the app are meant for.
a.	The sleep tracker, however, stands out as both visually appealing and easy to use due to its effective use of colour and imagery.
Interview 13
1. I could navigate fairly easily due to clear icons and menu bar. It didn’t take me long. A minute? It was quite quick as there was a clear layout and so it was on a level of common sense .
a.    I clicked on the home button on the menu bar at the bottom and navigated to the icon which said “daily achievements”
b.     I clicked on home and selected the recipes buttong.
2. Like i said, the app contains clear icons and layout. Especially the home as a central hub. Icons and text are definitely most helpful.
a. I can’t really think of anything for improvement.
3.     	Yes it does motivate me. I think theres a cohesive design and good amount of information, which actually, gives me the vibe of a personal assistant. The fact that my understanding of fitness increases the more i use the app is a plus, since it gives advice as well, for example with the sleep tracker. For improvement, perhaps a chatbox to be added in the future might further help, but from my experience the current information is adequate for me to want to use it. I think the information itself is fine but i think an alarm could be added to help regulate sleep patterns more actively. Perhaps water intake would be useful. For me thats really important because if theres one thing i slack on, its my water intake. Just needs to be added otherwise the way to log and track info is easy in the calories section.
4.     	How consistent is the design throughout the app?
The design is pretty consistent. The colour scheme especially. I actually quite like the colour scheme since its not too harsh on the eyes, and it gives off a professional tone.
a.     	It does in terms of colour scheme and text.
b.     	Again it does in terms of colour scheme and text but i feel like it could have had similar buttons? The layout basically. For example if you compare the mindfulness button to the low intensity exercises button. They could have been the same shape and size in terms as buttons? It would have made it more cohesive but i mean, it works still. Maybe thats just a small detail on my part.
5.     	I mean customisation is very important to me. It allows me to get more involved in a way and add my own personal touch. I usually prefer apps that allow me to do this. A bonus - I think a daily streak feature would be great? I think that would motivate me to keep up with my goals. It adds a level of competitiveness against myself.
6.     	it motivates me as i like sharing my fitness goals with my friends. I think doing productive things with friends motivates me more, and its more fun that way too.
a. Yes its definitely effective. Everyones different. Some are more private and some aren’t.
7.     Its an incentive, but rewards is not as important to me personally. I prefer the social aspect to be honest with you.
a.     If i had to choose it would be wellbeing.
8.     Mental health is extremely important. Especially now, i think everyones becoming more aware how important fitness is to improve your mental health. Because of this link, that motivates me to use the app. and especially because mental health is one of the bigger things important to me.
9. 8
a. Can you explain your rating?
I think its pretty easy to use, maybe some information like graphs might be a bit tricky to get. Maybe if there was an option to change preferences on how you view progress?
10. Yes as the aesthetic is not too much, like not too harsh. Its got a soft colour scheme with a spaced out layout.
a. The menu bar is probably the best feature in terms of accessibility. Because im using it a lot, my understanding as i go through the app improves until it gets really easy. Thats why i mentioned it took me no time at all to learn how to use the app.
 interview 14:
1.I had a moderate level of difficulty navigating through the app. Took me maybe 10 minutes.

a.I was able to get to daily achievements from the sleep tracker, however the daily achievements button was not obvious.
b.I clicked on chat from the bottom row buttons then the friend list. Afterwards I clicked on the dashboard then on recipes. 
2. the icons helped me with navigating. 
a. I cant think of anything.

3. I have no complaints about the level of information, but it doesn’t motivate me to use the app more.
4. The app was very consistent. 
a. The appearance and the design compared to other pages was very familiar. 
b. The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. 
5. It does not motivate me to use it. 

6. It does not. I see no reason to include a social aspect for the app and i think it should be removed. 

a. I don’t think it is effective. Social aspects aren’t necessary.
7. It doesn’t motivate me.

a. No, I have no preference. 
8. It does not motivate me.

9.  6 out of 10. 

a. Some of the text is unnoticeable such as the average heart rate button due to background colour text. The back seems like something you can’t click on and requires a lot of concentration to notice. The heart rate monitor page was very confusing to navigate. In addition, text was very hard to read. 

10. No. The colour of the app is not very appealing and I found it very unattractive. Some text was hard to read due to the colour of it and background, showing a poor combination for reading. 

a. I couldn’t really find anything which appealed to me.

interview 15:
1.The app was very easy to navigate. It required minimum effort for me to do so. It took me maybe 5 minutes to understand.

a.I clicked on the dashboard then I checked on the daily achievements button on the top right. 
b.I clicked on the dashboard then I clicked on view recipes. 
2. Icons mostly helped, but some buttons were not clear that they were buttons. For example the dashboard buttons such as today’s steps and that row.

a. perhaps make some icons more clear.
3. It doesn’t motivate me to use it, the amount of information shown on some pages made me feel overwhelmed.
4. The app was very consistent. 
a. All of the pages that I have view looks very consistent and similar. 
b.The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. 
5. It does not motivate me. However, I see why it would motivate others to use it. I do think the chat and recipes feel unnecessary. Would only use apps for fitness. Does too many things at once, quality over quantity.

6. I can see myself getting motivated through competition.

a.	Keeping privacy is essential.

7. Rewards would motivate me a lot, specifically the discount. Would make me exercise a lot. 

a.	Discounts to shopping. Don’t care about avatar customization.

8. It is important in the current day to balance your overall health, it is not only about physical health. So it would definitely motivate me.

9. 8 out of 10. 

a. Some pages are unclear, mainly the heart rate monitor and sometimes buttons are too small. However, the button row I really like because in case I get lost I know how to go back. Where there are pages with not too much information I feel it is good. 

10. Yes for sure, I like the consistency in design, but some pages put too many buttons/information into a page, making it a bit overwhelming.
a. I really like the bottom row buttons in case I get lost and I can backtrack to the main page, they’re also very understandable and stand out.




Interview 16:

1.Navigation was easy. Probably 2 minutes.
a. I was able to complete the task but it requires backtracking.

b. I was able to complete the task but it requires backtracking.
2. It did not take me long to fully understand it as the app pages were quite consistent. The colours and the format was simple and had a constant display. This helped me navigate the app quite well. 
a.	The heart rate monitor was very confusing and needs improvement.

3.	The app contained too much information which made me feel overwhelmed. I don't think additional information should be included. I think some information should be discarded as I found that the user interface showed too much. I think information should be excluded including the graphs. The page on sleep tracker for example should only focus on the essentials and information should be limited. But calorie tracking should include non-exercise calories burnt too.

4. Very consistent. (everything is one colour)

a. The appearance and the design of it is familiar to others. 
b.The hormonal health page has a similar design and appearance. However the icons are uncentered. 
5. It does not motivate me to use it. If anything, it makes the app very text heavy. Information should be limited and focus only on the important aspects. 

6. it doesn’t motivate me.

a. I don’t think it is effective. It isn’t necessary to begin with.
7. it doesn’t motivate me.

a. I like the discounts to food supplements. 
8. It does not motivate me.

9.  6 out of 10. 

a. The app contains too much text. The layout is also busy and the icons are not easy to follow. Also, the only way to backtrack is though the buttons on the bottom row. I believe pages on the app should include additional backtracking options.
10. moderately. Use of more colour could help, along with less text.
a. The buttons work and are obvious to see and hard to misclick. However, the app is very plain and chunky and backtracking is not easy. However, the app has a lot of wanted features. The rewards page seems intuitive for its layout and content, it’s very clear and to the point.

